Louisiana, session 2026, SB272.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2014.5(B)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2014.5. Expedited permitting program
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) The secretary shall adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act which shall include a notice that indicates such a permit issued under
the provisions of this Section is issued pursuant to the federal permitting parity
program for nuclear power generation.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-403 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 272